test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-AI-maham_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  
  Verb - mâham -  : #  VAI am-final verb — Wolvengrey p. 396; Fut+Def from Okimāsis p. 70

     mâham+V+AI+Ind+Prs+1Sg: nimâhên
     mâham+V+AI+Ind+Prs+2Sg: kimâhên
     mâham+V+AI+Ind+Prs+3Sg: mâham
     mâham+V+AI+Ind+Prs+4Sg/Pl: mâhamiyiwa
     mâham+V+AI+Ind+Prs+1Pl: nimâhênân
     mâham+V+AI+Ind+Prs+12Pl: [kimâhênaw, kimâhênânaw]
     mâham+V+AI+Ind+Prs+2Pl: kimâhênâwâw
     mâham+V+AI+Ind+Prs+3Pl: mâhamwak

     mâham+V+AI+Ind+Prt+1Sg: [nikî-mâhên, nikîmâhên]
     mâham+V+AI+Ind+Prt+2Sg: [kikî-mâhên, kikîmâhên]
     mâham+V+AI+Ind+Prt+3Sg: [kî-mâham, kîmâham]
     mâham+V+AI+Ind+Prt+4Sg/Pl: [kî-mâhamiyiwa, kîmâhamiyiwa]
     mâham+V+AI+Ind+Prt+1Pl: [nikî-mâhênân, nikîmâhênân]
     mâham+V+AI+Ind+Prt+12Pl: [kikî-mâhênaw, kikîmâhênaw, kikî-mâhênânaw, kikîmâhênânaw]
     mâham+V+AI+Ind+Prt+2Pl: [kikî-mâhênâwâw, kikîmâhênâwâw]
     mâham+V+AI+Ind+Prt+3Pl: [kî-mâhamwak, kîmâhamwak]
     
     mâham+V+AI+Ind+Fut+Def+1Sg: [nika-mâhên, nikamâhên]
     mâham+V+AI+Ind+Fut+Def+2Sg: [kika-mâhên, kikamâhên]
     mâham+V+AI+Ind+Fut+Def+3Sg: [ka-mâham, kamâham]
     mâham+V+AI+Ind+Fut+Def+4Sg/Pl: [ka-mâhamiyiwa, kamâhamiyiwa]
     mâham+V+AI+Ind+Fut+Def+1Pl: [nika-mâhênân, nikamâhênân]
     mâham+V+AI+Ind+Fut+Def+12Pl: [kika-mâhênaw, kikamâhênaw, kikamâhênânaw, kika-mâhênânaw]
     mâham+V+AI+Ind+Fut+Def+2Pl: [kika-mâhênâwâw, kikamâhênâwâw]
     mâham+V+AI+Ind+Fut+Def+3Pl: [ka-mâhamwak, kamâhamwak]
     
     mâham+V+AI+Ind+Fut+Int+1Sg: [niwî-mâhên, niwîmâhên]
     mâham+V+AI+Ind+Fut+Int+2Sg: [kiwî-mâhên, kiwîmâhên]
     mâham+V+AI+Ind+Fut+Int+3Sg: [wî-mâham, wîmâham]
     mâham+V+AI+Ind+Fut+Int+4Sg/Pl: [wî-mâhamiyiwa, wîmâhamiyiwa]
     mâham+V+AI+Ind+Fut+Int+1Pl: [niwî-mâhênân, niwîmâhênân]
     mâham+V+AI+Ind+Fut+Int+12Pl: [kiwî-mâhênaw, kiwîmâhênaw, kiwî-mâhênânaw, kiwîmâhênânaw]
     mâham+V+AI+Ind+Fut+Int+2Pl: [kiwî-mâhênâwâw, kiwîmâhênâwâw]
     mâham+V+AI+Ind+Fut+Int+3Pl: [wî-mâhamwak, wîmâhamwak]
     
     PV/e+mâham+V+AI+Cnj+Prs+1Sg: [ê-mâhamân, êmâhamân]
     PV/e+mâham+V+AI+Cnj+Prs+2Sg: [ê-mâhaman, êmâhaman]
     PV/e+mâham+V+AI+Cnj+Prs+3Sg: [ê-mâhahk, êmâhahk]
     PV/e+mâham+V+AI+Cnj+Prs+4Sg/Pl: [ê-mâhamiyit, êmâhamiyit]
     PV/e+mâham+V+AI+Cnj+Prs+1Pl: [ê-mâhamâhk, êmâhamâhk]
     PV/e+mâham+V+AI+Cnj+Prs+12Pl: [ê-mâhamahk, êmâhamahk]
     PV/e+mâham+V+AI+Cnj+Prs+2Pl: [ê-mâhamêk, êmâhamêk]
     PV/e+mâham+V+AI+Cnj+Prs+3Pl: [ê-mâhahkik, êmâhahkik]
     
     mâham+V+AI+Cnj+Prs+1Sg: [mâhamân, mâhamân]
     mâham+V+AI+Cnj+Prs+2Sg: [mâhaman, mâhaman]
     mâham+V+AI+Cnj+Prs+3Sg: [mâhahk, mâhahk]
     mâham+V+AI+Cnj+Prs+4Sg/Pl: [mâhamiyit, mâhamiyit]
     mâham+V+AI+Cnj+Prs+1Pl: [mâhamâhk, mâhamâhk]
     mâham+V+AI+Cnj+Prs+12Pl: [mâhamahk, mâhamahk]
     mâham+V+AI+Cnj+Prs+2Pl: [mâhamêk, mâhamêk]
     mâham+V+AI+Cnj+Prs+3Pl: [mâhahkik, mâhahkik]
     
     mâham+V+AI+Cnj+Prt+1Sg: [kî-mâhamân, kîmâhamân]
     mâham+V+AI+Cnj+Prt+2Sg: [kî-mâhaman, kîmâhaman]
     mâham+V+AI+Cnj+Prt+3Sg: [kî-mâhahk, kîmâhahk]
     mâham+V+AI+Cnj+Prt+4Sg/Pl: [kî-mâhamiyit, kîmâhamiyit]
     mâham+V+AI+Cnj+Prt+1Pl: [kî-mâhamâhk, kîmâhamâhk]
     mâham+V+AI+Cnj+Prt+12Pl: [kî-mâhamahk, kîmâhamahk]
     mâham+V+AI+Cnj+Prt+2Pl: [kî-mâhamêk, kîmâhamêk]
     mâham+V+AI+Cnj+Prt+3Pl: [kî-mâhahkik, kîmâhahkik]
     
     mâham+V+AI+Cnj+Fut+Int+1Sg: [wî-mâhamân, wîmâhamân]
     mâham+V+AI+Cnj+Fut+Int+2Sg: [wî-mâhaman, wîmâhaman]
     mâham+V+AI+Cnj+Fut+Int+3Sg: [wî-mâhahk, wîmâhahk]
     mâham+V+AI+Cnj+Fut+Int+4Sg/Pl: [wî-mâhamiyit, wîmâhamiyit]
     mâham+V+AI+Cnj+Fut+Int+1Pl: [wî-mâhamâhk, wîmâhamâhk]
     mâham+V+AI+Cnj+Fut+Int+12Pl: [wî-mâhamahk, wîmâhamahk]
     mâham+V+AI+Cnj+Fut+Int+2Pl: [wî-mâhamêk, wîmâhamêk]
     mâham+V+AI+Cnj+Fut+Int+3Pl: [wî-mâhahkik, wîmâhahkik]
     
     mâham+V+AI+Cnj+Rel+Fut+Int+1Sg: [wî-wîci-mâhamimân, wîwîcimâhamimân]
     mâham+V+AI+Cnj+Rel+Fut+Int+2Sg: [wî-wîci-mâhamiman, wîwîcimâhamiman]
     mâham+V+AI+Cnj+Rel+Fut+Int+3Sg: [wî-wîci-mâhamimihk, wîwîcimâhamimihk]
     mâham+V+AI+Cnj+Rel+Fut+Int+4Sg/Pl: [wî-wîci-mâhamimiyit, wîwîcimâhamimiyit]
     mâham+V+AI+Cnj+Rel+Fut+Int+1Pl: [wî-wîci-mâhamimâhk, wîwîcimâhamimâhk]
     mâham+V+AI+Cnj+Rel+Fut+Int+12Pl: [wî-wîci-mâhamimahk, wîwîcimâhamimahk]
     mâham+V+AI+Cnj+Rel+Fut+Int+2Pl: [wî-wîci-mâhamimêk, wîwîcimâhamimêk]
     mâham+V+AI+Cnj+Rel+Fut+Int+3Pl: [wî-wîci-mâhamimihkik, wîwîcimâhamimihkik]
     
     mâham+V+AI+Fut+Cond+1Sg: mâhamâni
     mâham+V+AI+Fut+Cond+2Sg: mâhamani
     mâham+V+AI+Fut+Cond+3Sg: mâhaki
     mâham+V+AI+Fut+Cond+4Sg/Pl: mâhamiyici
     mâham+V+AI+Fut+Cond+1Pl: mâhamâhki
     mâham+V+AI+Fut+Cond+12Pl: [mâhamahko, mâhamahki]
     mâham+V+AI+Fut+Cond+2Pl: mâhamêko
     mâham+V+AI+Fut+Cond+3Pl: mâhahkwâwi

     mâham+V+AI+Imp+Imm+2Sg: mâha
     mâham+V+AI+Imp+Imm+12Pl: mâhêtân
     mâham+V+AI+Imp+Imm+2Pl: mâhamok
     
     mâham+V+AI+Imp+Del+2Sg: mâhamôhkan
     mâham+V+AI+Imp+Del+12Pl: mâhamôhkahk
     mâham+V+AI+Imp+Del+2Pl: mâhamôhkêk
